Wisconsin, session 2025, AB650.
do enact as follows:AB650,14Section 1. 20.445 (1) (aL) of the statutes is amended to read:AB650,2,8520.445 (1) (aL) Unemployment insurance administration; controlled 1substances testing and substance abuse treatment; identity proofing. Biennially, the 2amounts in the schedule for conducting screenings of applicants, testing applicants 3for controlled substances, the provision of substance abuse treatment to applicants 4and claimants, and related expenses under s. 108.133 and for costs related to 5identity proofing under s. 108.14 (10m) for which federal funding is unavailable. 6Notwithstanding s. 20.001 (3) (b), the unencumbered balance on June 30 of each 7odd-numbered year shall be transferred to the unemployment program integrity 8fund.AB650,2,99